Colorado, session 2026A, HB1138.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) Organized felony-level retail theft, which is retail theft of at least
$2,000, and gift card fraud pose a growing threat to public safety, small
businesses, large retailers, supply chains, and state and local tax revenues;
(b) Felony-level retail theft and gift card fraud increasingly involve
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

organized criminal enterprises operating across jurisdictional boundaries;
(c) Colorado has successfully reduced auto theft through a
coordinated, data-driven, grant-based approach administered by the
Colorado auto theft prevention authority in the department of public safety;
and
(d) A similar model, adapted to felony-level retail theft and housed
within the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety,
will enhance statewide coordination, prosecution, prevention, and
enforcement.
(2) The general assembly declares that the purposes of this act are
to:
(a) Establish a felony-level retail theft prevention program in the
division of criminal justice;
(b) Provide grant funding and technical assistance to local
governments, law enforcement agencies, prosecutors, and regional task
forces;
(c) Improve data collection, analysis, and interagency coordination
related to felony-level retail theft and gift card fraud; and
(d) Support prevention, investigation, and prosecution strategies
targeting organized felony-level retail theft and gift card fraud.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 24-33.5-540 as
follows:
24-33.5-540. Retail theft prevention advisory board - grant
program - rules- report - definitions - repeal.
(1) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "ADVISORY BOARD" MEANS THE RETAIL THEFT PREVENTION
ADVISORY BOARD CREATED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1138

(b) "COLORADO RETAIL THEFT TASK FORCE" MEANS THE STATEWIDE
TASK FORCE FORMED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TO PROVIDE GREATER
COORDINATION AMONG LAW ENFORCEMENT TO IDENTIFY, DISRUPT, AND
PROSECUTE ORGANIZED CRIMINAL RINGS THAT STEAL GOODS FROM
RETAILERS.
(c) "ELIGIBLE ENTITY" MEANS A LOCAL OR STATE LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, DISTRICT ATTORNEY'S OFFICE,
MULTIJURISDICTIONAL OR REGIONAL TASK FORCE, OR TRIBAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.
(d) "FELONY-LEVEL RETAIL THEFT" MEANS A FELONY-LEVEL THEFT
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-4-401 (2)(f) TO (2)(j) COMMITTED AGAINST A
RETAILER OF GOODS.
(e) "GRANT PROGRAM" MEANS THE RETAIL THEFT PREVENTION
GRANT PROGRAM CREATED IN SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) Advisory board.
(a) THERE IS CREATED THE RETAIL THEFT PREVENTION ADVISORY
BOARD IN THE DIVISION, WHICH CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S
DESIGNEE;
(II) ONE MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS THE COLORADO RETAIL THEFT
TASK FORCE, APPOINTED BY THE TASK FORCE;
(III) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC
SAFETY, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S DESIGNEE;
(IV) TWO MEMBERS WHO REPRESENT LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT,
ONE APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND
ONE APPOINTED BY THE MINORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES;
(V) ONE DISTRICT ATTORNEY, OR THE DISTRICT ATTORNEY'S
DESIGNEE, APPOINTED BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE COLORADO
DISTRICT ATTORNEYS' COUNCIL;
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1138

(VI) THE DIRECTOR OF THE DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE;
(VII) ONE PUBLIC DEFENDER, OR THE PUBLIC DEFENDER'S DESIGNEE,
APPOINTED BY THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER;
(VIII) ONE MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS LOCAL GOVERNMENT,
APPOINTED BY THE MAJORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES;
AND
(IX) THREE NONVOTING ADVISORY MEMBERS, AS FOLLOWS:
(A) ONE NONVOTING MEMBER FROM A LARGE RETAILER WITH MORE
THAN FIVE HUNDRED EMPLOYEES, APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE
SENATE;
(B) ONE NONVOTING MEMBER FROM A SMALL RETAILER WITH FEWER
THAN TWO HUNDRED FIFTY EMPLOYEES, APPOINTED BY THE SENATE
MAJORITY LEADER; AND
(C) ONE NONVOTING MEMBER FROM A NONPROFIT RETAILER,
APPOINTED BY THE SENATE MINORITY LEADER.
(b) ADVISORY BOARD APPOINTMENTS MUST BE MADE NO LATER
THAN SEPTEMBER 1, 2026. THE ADVISORY BOARD SHALL SELECT A CHAIR
AND THE CHAIR SHALL CALL THE FIRST MEETING NO LATER THAN NOVEMBER
1, 2026. THE ADVISORY BOARD SHALL MEET AT ANY TIME THE BOARD DEEMS
NECESSARY.
(3) Duties and responsibilities. THE ADVISORY BOARD HAS THE
FOLLOWING DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
(a) TO DEVELOP GRANT APPLICATION DEADLINES, DATES BY WHICH
GRANTS MUST BE AWARDED, CRITERIA FOR GRANT AWARDS, AND THE
FREQUENCY OF CONSIDERATION OF GRANT APPLICATIONS;
(b) TO REVIEW GRANT APPLICATIONS AND AWARD GRANTS
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION;
(c) TO COLLECT AND ANALYZE DATA RELATED TO ORGANIZED
FELONY-LEVEL RETAIL THEFT AND GIFT CARD FRAUD TRENDS, LOSSES,
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1138

PROSECUTIONS, AND OUTCOMES IN COLORADO; AND
(d) TO DEVELOP POLICY RECOMMENDATIONS IN COORDINATION WITH
STATE AND FEDERAL PARTNERS, INCLUDING THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC
SAFETY, DISTRICT ATTORNEYS, LOCAL GOVERNMENTS, AND FEDERAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES, ON HOW TO COMBAT FELONY-LEVEL RETAIL THEFT
AND GIFT CARD FRAUD.
(4) Grant program.
(a) THE RETAIL THEFT PREVENTION GRANT PROGRAM IS CREATED IN
THE DIVISION. GRANT AWARDS MAY BE USED FOR THE FOLLOWING
PURPOSES:
(I) TO INVESTIGATE AND PROSECUTE ORGANIZED FELONY-LEVEL
RETAIL THEFT OR GIFT CARD FRAUD;
(II) TO DEVELOP OR INVEST IN TECHNOLOGY, DATA-SHARING
SYSTEMS, AND ANALYTICS TOOLS TO ANALYZE FELONY-LEVEL RETAIL THEFT
AND GIFT CARD FRAUD METRICS;
(III) TO PROVIDE TRAINING AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO
RETAILERS OR LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES; AND
(IV) TO DEVELOP PREVENTION AND DETERRENCE INITIATIVES
SPECIFIC TO FELONY-LEVEL RETAIL THEFT AND GIFT CARD FRAUD.
(b) THE ADVISORY BOARD SHALL ADMINISTER THE GRANT PROGRAM
AND SHALL AWARD GRANTS AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBSECTION (4). GRANTS
MUST BE PAID OUT OF MONEY APPROPRIATED PURSUANT TO SECTION
24-33.5-117 (7) OR FROM GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS RECEIVED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(e) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) TO RECEIVE A GRANT, AN ELIGIBLE ENTITY MUST SUBMIT AN
APPLICATION TO THE ADVISORY BOARD IN ACCORDANCE WITH RULES
ADOPTED BY THE DIVISION IN COLLABORATION WITH THE COLORADO RETAIL
THEFT TASK FORCE AND WITHIN THE DEADLINES ESTABLISHED BY THE
ADVISORY BOARD.
(d) THE ADVISORY BOARD SHALL REVIEW THE APPLICATIONS
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1138

RECEIVED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (4).
(e) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS,
GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE
PURPOSE OF AWARDING GRANTS PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(5) THE DIVISION MAY ENTER INTO AN INTERGOVERNMENTAL
OPERATING AGREEMENT WITH THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S OFFICE FOR THE
ADVISORY BOARD AND THE COLORADO RETAIL THEFT TASK FORCE TO SHARE
RESOURCES AND COORDINATE ACTIVITIES RELATED TO REDUCING
ORGANIZED FELONY-LEVEL THEFT IN THE STATE.
(6) Report. BEGINNING JANUARY 2028, AND EACH JANUARY
THEREAFTER, THE DIVISION SHALL INCLUDE, AS PART OF ITS PRESENTATION
DURING ITS"SMART ACT" HEARING REQUIRED BY SECTION 2-7-203, THE
FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(a) THE GRANT RECIPIENTS AND AMOUNT OF EACH GRANT;
(b) OUTCOMES AND PERFORMANCE METRICS REPORTED BY GRANT
RECIPIENTS;
(c) THE NUMBER OF CRIMINAL CASES INITIATED FOR ORGANIZED
FELONY-LEVEL RETAIL THEFT AS REPORTED BY DISTRICT ATTORNEYS AND
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S OFFICE, INCLUDING THE AMOUNT OF MONEY
SOUGHT IN EACH CASE; AND
(d) THE OUTCOME OF EACH CASE INITIATED FOR ORGANIZED
FELONY-LEVEL RETAIL THEFT.
(7) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE NOVEMBER 1, 2029.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-117, amend
(7) and (9) as follows:
24-33.5-117. Crime prevention through safer streets grant
program - created - committee - reports - repeal.
(7) (a) The general assembly shall appropriate ten million three
hundred thousand dollars in fiscal year 2022-23 from the general fund for
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1138

the grant program AND THE RETAIL THEFT PREVENTION GRANT PROGRAM
CREATED IN SECTION 24-33.5-540. Any unexpended money remaining at the
end of the 2022-23 A state fiscal year from this appropriation may be used
by the department until fully expended without further appropriation and
must not be used for any other purpose other than the purposes set forth in
this section AND SECTION 24-33.5-540.
(b) ON JULY 1, 2027, TWO HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS OF THE
UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED MONEY REMAINING AT THE END OF THE
2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR FROM THE APPROPRIATION MADE PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF THIS SECTION REVERTS TO THE GENERAL FUND AND IS
NOT AVAILABLE FOR FURTHER EXPENDITURE BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(9) This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2027 NOVEMBER 1,
2029.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1138

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1138